test/tools/basic.punctuation.lexc
! Ripped and simplified from North sámi material: testing that lexer eats
! punctuation properly

Multichar_Symbols +PUNCT

LEXICON Root
,+PUNCT:,  # ;
.+PUNCT:.  # ;
..+PUNCT:..   # ;
...+PUNCT:...   # ;
?+PUNCT:?  # ; 
…+PUNCT:…  # ;
¿+PUNCT:¿  # ;
¶+PUNCT:¶  # ;
§+PUNCT:§  # ;
§§+PUNCT:§§ # ;
$+PUNCT:$  # ;
€+PUNCT:€  # ;
£+PUNCT:£  # ;
®+PUNCT:®  # ;
©+PUNCT:©  # ;

•+PUNCT:•  # ; !U+2022 Bullet
●+PUNCT:●  # ; !U+25CF Black circle
·+PUNCT:·  # ; !U+0097 Middle dot
ּ+PUNCT:ּ   # ; !U+05BC Hebrew (sic!) middle dot
·+PUNCT:·  # ; !U+0387, Greek (sic!) middle dot, or rather semicolon, in Greek.
-+PUNCT:-  # ; !hyphen
--+PUNCT:--  # ; !double hyphen
–+PUNCT:–  # ; !endash
—+PUNCT:—  # ; !emdash
―+PUNCT:―  # ; !horizontal bar U+2015
=+PUNCT:=  # ;
≈+PUNCT:≈  # ;
&+PUNCT:&  # ;
'+PUNCT:'  # ;
*+PUNCT:*  # ;
++PUNCT:+  # ;
±+PUNCT:±  # ;
`+PUNCT:`  # ;
´+PUNCT:´  # ;
/+PUNCT:/  # ; 
+/-+PUNCT:+/- # ;
~+PUNCT:~	  # ;
«+PUNCT:«  # ;
»+PUNCT:»  # ;
“+PUNCT:“  # ;
”+PUNCT:”  # ;
‘+PUNCT:‘  # ;
’+PUNCT:’  # ;
„+PUNCT:„  # ;
‹+PUNCT:‹  # ;
›+PUNCT:›  # ;
(+PUNCT:(  # ;
)+PUNCT:)  # ;
[+PUNCT:[  # ;
]+PUNCT:]  # ;
{+PUNCT:{  # ;
}+PUNCT:}  # ;
! escape required
%"+PUNCT:%"  # ;
%!+PUNCT:%!  # ;
%<+PUNCT:%<  # ;
%>+PUNCT:%>  # ;
%%+PUNCT:%%  # ;
%:+PUNCT:%:  # ;
%;+PUNCT:%;  # ;
%#+PUNCT:%#  # ;
